Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1015
Ownership by child; applicability of penalties.

When an animal is owned by a minor child, the parent of such minor child with whom the child resides or legal guardian with whom the child resides shall be subject to the penalties provided under sections 28-1008 to 28-1017, 28-1019, and 28-1020 if the animal is abandoned or cruelly neglected.

Laws 1990, LB 50, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 273, § 8;

Laws 2008, LB764, § 9;

Laws 2008, LB1055, § 6;

Laws 2009, LB494, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB360, § 8.